South Dakota, session 2026, HB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-35-6 be AMENDED:
22-35-6. Any person individual who, knowing that he or she the individual is not
privileged to do so, enters or remains in any place premises where notice against trespass
is given, is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Notice may be given by:
(1) Actual communication to the person individual who subsequently commits the
trespass;
(2) Posting in a manner reasonably likely to come to the attention of trespassers; or
(3) Fencing or other enclosure which that a reasonable person would recognize as
being designed to exclude trespassers;
is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
However, if such trespasserIf the individual defies an order to leave and not return,
personally communicated to him or her the individual by the owner or lessee of the
premises or in writing by any other authorized person as provided in section 2 of this Act,
the trespasser is guilty of criminal trespass, which is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Only a law enforcement officer as defined in § 23-3-27 or 23-3-27.1, or 18 U.S.C.
§ 1515 (September 13, 1994), may arrest an individual for a violation of this section.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-35:
A written order excluding an individual from a premises pursuant to § 22-35-6
must include a directive that the individual remain fifty feet or more from the property
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.247.9 2 1025
boundary, unless the individual is transiting a public right-of-way. The written order may
be issued by:
(1) A law enforcement officer as defined in § 23-3-27 or 23-3-27.1, or 18 U.S.C.
§ 1515 (September 13, 1994); or
(2) A uniformed private security officer acting in conformance with any applicable
standards promulgated by the governing body of the political subdivision with
jurisdiction over the premises.
The employer of the law enforcement officer or uniformed private security officer
shall maintain a copy of the written order for at least one year after the date of its
issuance.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-35:
A municipality may enact and enforce ordinances regarding trespass that impose
stricter standards, excepting penalties, than those set forth in this chapter. A municipal
trespass ordinance is deemed supplemental to, not inconsistent with, this chapter.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.